Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0506.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1598. (1) The governing body of a public school or nonpublic school shall not unenroll a pupil solely based on the receipt of a records request from another school. (2) The governing body of a public school or nonpublic school shall not unenroll a pupil unless the governing body receives written confirmation of enrollment from the school that will be receiving the pupil. The written confirmation described in this subsection must include at least all of the following: (a) The pupil's full name. (b) The pupil's date of birth. (c) The grade level in which the pupil will be enrolled at the receiving school. (d) The name and address of the receiving school. (e) The date that the pupil officially enrolled in the receiving school. (f) A signature from an authorized official of the receiving school verifying that the pupil has been enrolled in the receiving school.